California, session 20252026, SB719.
do enact as follows:SECTION 1. Section 28200 of the Vehicle Code is amended to read:28200. Unless the context requires otherwise, for purposes of this chapter, the following terms have the following meanings:(a) “Account holder” means a person who is a party to or a user of services provided under a contract for connected vehicle service with a covered provider, and includes, but is not limited to, a subscriber, customer, or registered user.(b) “Connected vehicle location access” is a type of connected vehicle service that allows a person who is outside of a vehicle, excluding a covered provider or vehicle cellular data provider, to view or track the location of the vehicle, including, but not limited to, a location determined by a Global Positioning System (GPS), whether through the internet, an app-based technology, or any other remote wireless connectivity technology.(c) “Connected vehicle service” means a software application that is designed to be operated on a mobile device provided by or on behalf of a vehicle manufacturer that enables a person, excluding a covered provider or vehicle cellular data provider, to remotely obtain the location of the vehicle or send data from, or send commands to, a vehicle.(d) “Connected vehicle service account” means an account or other means by which a person enrolls in or obtains access to a connected vehicle service.(e) “Connected vehicle service request” means a request by a person to terminate another person’s access to connected vehicle service.(f) “Covered provider” means a vehicle manufacturer or an entity acting on behalf of the vehicle manufacturer that provides connected vehicle service.(g) “Requestor” means any person submitting a connected vehicle service request consistent with subdivision (a) of Section 28224.(h) “Vehicle” means a motor vehicle having a manufacturer’s maximum gross vehicle weight rating under 6,001 pounds, with connected vehicle service.SEC. 2. Section 28202 of the Vehicle Code is amended to read:28202. (a) A vehicle with connected vehicle service shall clearly indicate to a person who is inside the vehicle if connected vehicle location access is enabled.(b) This section shall apply to vehicles beginning with the 2031 model year.SEC. 3. Section 28206 of the Vehicle Code is amended to read:28206. This chapter does not apply to vehicles owned or operated by a rental company, as defined in Section 1939.01 of the Civil Code.SEC. 4. Section 28222 of the Vehicle Code is amended to read:28222. To enhance transparency and communication, the process to submit a connected vehicle service request or obtain a new connected vehicle service account shall be efficient, secure, user-friendly, and include all of the following features:(a) Upon submission of a connected vehicle service request or request to obtain a new connected vehicle service account consistent with this article, the covered provider shall automatically send a confirmation email to the requestor, acknowledging the receipt of the request. This email shall contain a reference number for the request and an outline of the subsequent steps in the process.(b) Upon completing the review of the request, the covered provider shall inform the requestor of the action taken, including, as applicable, whether a person’s access to connected vehicle service has been terminated, or if additional information or proof of legal possession of the vehicle is needed. This alert shall clearly state any relevant details or further actions required from the requestor to complete a successful connected vehicle service request.(c) If a connected vehicle service request is approved, the covered provider shall provide the requestor with a clear explanation and guidance on how to create their own connected vehicle service account, if applicable, to ensure that the requestor can maintain control over the connected vehicle service once another person’s access to connected vehicle service has been terminated.SEC. 5. Section 28224 of the Vehicle Code is amended to read:28224. (a) A person making a connected vehicle service request shall demonstrate to a covered provider the authority to terminate a person’s access to connected vehicle service by providing both of the following:(1) The vehicle identification number.(2) Proof of legal possession of the vehicle, which may be a legal title to the vehicle, or a dissolution decree, temporary court order, or domestic violence restraining order that awards possession or exclusive use of the vehicle to the requestor. A court order awarding sole possession or exclusive use of a vehicle shall take priority over a vehicle title showing joint ownership for purposes of this article.(b) A covered provider shall not require a requestor to provide any proof of legal possession other than what is required in subdivision (a) to establish the authority to terminate a person’s access to connected vehicle service.(c) A covered provider shall not require a requestor to take any action to terminate a person’s access to connected vehicle service other than what is set forth in this section, including, but not limited to, requiring any of the following:(1) Payment of a fee, penalty, or other charge to complete a connected vehicle service request.(2) Maintaining or extending the term of a connected vehicle service account.(3) Approval by any account holder, including, but not limited to, the named account holder, of the change in access.(4) An increase in the rate charged for the connected vehicle service.(d) A covered provider shall terminate a person’s access to connected vehicle service within two business days after the date of receiving a completed connected vehicle service request from a requestor who meets the requirements of this section.SEC. 6. Section 28226 of the Vehicle Code is amended to read:28226. (a) If a covered provider terminated a person’s access to connected vehicle service in response to a connected vehicle service request, the covered provider shall not provide to the person any data or information regarding the requestor, the vehicle, or any new connected vehicle service account that was generated after that person’s access to the connected vehicle service was terminated.(b) A covered provider shall ensure that all personal information provided during the process to terminate a person’s access to connected vehicle service is handled with appropriate security and privacy, adhering to relevant data protection laws and regulations.(c) A covered provider and any officer, director, employee, vendor, or agent thereof shall treat any information submitted by a person making a connected vehicle service request pursuant to this article as confidential and shall comply with applicable privacy laws.(d) A covered provider shall not share information submitted by a person making a connected vehicle service request pursuant to this article with any third party without the affirmative consent of the requestor, unless sharing that information is required to effectuate a connected vehicle service request.(e) Nothing in this section shall preclude a covered provider from responding to a court order or warrant.SEC. 7. Section 28244 of the Vehicle Code is amended to read:28244. Disabling the connected vehicle location access from inside the vehicle shall not result in an account holder of the connected vehicle service receiving any notification related to the connected vehicle location access being disabled, including, but not limited to, an alert, email, text, or telephone call.SEC. 8. Section 28246 is added to the Vehicle Code, to read:28246. This article shall become operative as follows:(a) Beginning with the 2031 model year, all vehicles with connected vehicle location access.(b) For 2028, 2029, and 2030 model year vehicles, as soon as practicable after the vehicle is sold unless technologically infeasible.(c) On or before July 1, 2027, for 2027 model year or older vehicles unless technologically infeasible.SEC. 9. No reimbursement is required by this act pursuant to Section 6 of Article XIII B of the California Constitution because the only costs that may be incurred by a local agency or school district will be incurred because this act creates a new crime or infraction, eliminates a crime or infraction, or changes the penalty for a crime or infraction, within the meaning of Section 17556 of the Government Code, or changes the definition of a crime within the meaning of Section 6 of Article XIII B of the California Constitution.SEC. 10. This act is an urgency statute necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health, or safety within the meaning of Article IV of the California Constitution and shall go into immediate effect. The facts constituting the necessity are:In order to allow automobile manufacturers sufficient time to carefully and safely redesign and update automobiles to provide the technology required by Senate Bill 1394 (Chapter 655 of the Statutes of 2024), it is necessary that this act take effect immediately.